Ohio, session 136, SB287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) As used in this section, "eligible 3
individual" means an individual who meets all of the following 4
criteria: 5
(1) The individual is between sixteen years of age and 6
thirty-five years of age at the time the Farming and Workforce 7
Development Program commences. 8
(2) The individual is a resident of this state. 9
(B) The Farming and Workforce Development Program is 10
hereby created, which shall provide training to eligible 11
individuals to prepare such individuals for seasonal crop 12
farming employment. Each county office of the Ohio State 13
University Extension and Central State University Extension 14
shall develop guidelines and policies for the application 15
process, training coursework, and implementation of the Program. 16
A person who has been convicted of or plead guilty to a 17
felony in this state or another state is eligible to participate 18
in the program so long as the person meets the definition of 19
"eligible individual." 20

S. B. No. 287 Page 2
As Introduced
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 21
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 22
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 23
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 24
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 25
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 26
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 27
Section 3. 28
29
1 2 3 4 5
A AGR DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 700514 Special Projects $500,000 $0
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $500,000 $0
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $500,000 $0
SPECIAL PROJECTS 30
The foregoing appropriation item 700514, Special Projects, 31
shall be used to support the activities of the Farming and 32
Workforce Development Program established under Section 1 of 33
this act. 34
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 35
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 36
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 37
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 38
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 39
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 40

S. B. No. 287 Page 3
As Introduced
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 41
applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. 42